Illinois, session 104th, HB1561.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Real Estate Appraiser Licensing Act of 2002 5is amended by adding Section 5-60 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 458/5-60 new)7    Sec. 5-60. Grandfather clause. 8    (a) Any person or business that, as of January 1, 1995, was 9practicing as an appraiser in the State of Illinois and had a 10minimum of 2 years of experience practicing as an appraiser is 11exempt from the required licensure as a certified general real 12estate appraiser under Section 5-10.13    (b) On and after July 1, 2029, no person or business shall 14be issued a certified general real estate appraiser license 15using the exemption in subsection (a).